District of Columbia statutes.
29-701.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Certificate of limited partnership” means the certificate required by § 29-702.01. The term includes the certificate as amended or restated.

(2)

“Contribution”, except in the phrase “right of contribution”, means any benefit described in § 29-705.01 provided by a person to a limited partnership to become a partner or in the person’s capacity as a partner.

(3)

“Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a limited partnership to a person on account of a transferable interest or in the person’s capacity as a partner.

(A)

The term includes:

(i)

A redemption or other purchase by a limited partnership of a transferable interest; and

(ii)

A transfer to a partner in return for the partner's relinquishment of any right to participate as a partner in the management or conduct of the partnership's activities and affairs or to have access to records or other information concerning the partnership's activities and affairs; and

(B)

The term does not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past service or payments made in the ordinary course of business under a bona fide retirement plan or other bona fide benefits program.

(4)

“Foreign limited liability limited partnership” means a foreign limited partnership whose general partners have limited liability for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the foreign limited partnership under a provision similar to § 29-704.04(c).

(5)

“Foreign limited partnership” means a partnership formed under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the District which would be a limited partnership if formed under the laws of the District. The term includes a foreign limited liability limited partnership.

(6)

“General partner” means:

(A)

With respect to a limited partnership, a person that:

(i)

Becomes a general partner under § 29-704.01; or was a general partner in a limited partnership when the limited partnership became subject to this chapter under § 29-711.01(a) or (b); and

(ii)

Has not dissociated as a general partner under § 29-706.03[; and]

(B)

With respect to a foreign limited partnership, a person that has rights, powers, and obligations similar to those of a general partner in a limited partnership.

(7)

“Limited liability limited partnership”, except in the phrase “foreign limited liability limited partnership”, means a limited partnership whose certificate of limited partnership states that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

(8)

“Limited partner” means:

(A)

With respect to a limited partnership, a person that:

(i)

Becomes a limited partner under § 29-703.01; or was a limited partner in a limited partnership when the limited partnership became subject to this chapter under § 29-711.01(a) or (b); and

(ii)

Has not dissociated as a limited partner under § 29-706.01[; and]

(B)

With respect to a foreign limited partnership, a person that has rights, powers, and obligations similar to those of a limited partner in a limited partnership.

(9)

“Limited partnership”, except in the phrases “foreign limited partnership” and “foreign limited liability limited partnership”, or “domestic limited partnership”, means an entity, having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners, which is formed under this chapter by 2 or more persons or becomes subject to this chapter under subchapter X of this chapter, Chapter 2 of this title, or § 29-711.01(a) or (b). The term includes a limited liability limited partnership.

(10)

“Partner” means a limited partner or general partner.

(11)

“Partnership agreement” means the partners’ agreement, whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any combination, concerning the matters described in § 29-701.07. The term includes the agreement as amended or restated.

(12)

“Person dissociated as a general partner” means a person dissociated as a general partner of a limited partnership.

(13)

“Required information” means the information that a limited partnership is required to maintain under § 29-701.08.

(14)

“Transferable interest” means the right, as initially owned by a person in the person’s capacity as a partner, to receive distributions from a limited partnership in accordance with the partnership agreement, whether or not the person remains a partner or continues to own any part of the right. The term applies to any fraction of the interest, by whomever owned.

(15)

“Transferee” means a person to which all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a partner. The term includes a person that owns a transferable interest under § 29-706.02(a)(3) or § 29-706.05(a)(5).

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(2)(A), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-705.08.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 102 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.